Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-148
Purposes of sections.

The purposes of sections 43-147 to 43-154 are to:

(1) Authorize the department to enter into interstate agreements with agencies of other states for the protection of children on whose behalf adoption assistance is being provided by the department; and

(2) Provide procedures for interstate children's adoption assistance payments, including medical payments.

Laws 1985, LB 447, § 2.